Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1065.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; hyperbaric oxygen therapy for military veterans fund The sum of $3,640,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the hyperbaric oxygen therapy for military veterans fund established by section 41-610.01, Arizona Revised Statutes.